Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.10.080

Suspension and removal of directors, officers, and employees.

(1) In addition to the remedies set forth in RCW 30B.10.070, the director may, as applicable, issue and serve a current or former director, officer, manager, or employee of a state trust company or its affiliate with written notice of intent to remove such person from office or employment, or to prohibit such person from participating in the conduct of the affairs of the state trust company, its affiliate, or any depository institution, trust company, or affiliate of such depository institution or trust company, doing business in Washington state, whenever:

(a) Such person has committed an unsafe or unsound practice or a violation or practice involving a breach of fiduciary duty, personal dishonesty, recklessness, or incompetence; and

(b)(i) The state trust company has suffered or is likely to suffer substantial financial loss or other damage as a result of the person's acts or omissions as set forth in (a) of this subsection; or

(ii) The interests of beneficiaries, trustors, shareholders, or the general public could be seriously prejudiced by reason of the person's acts or omissions as set forth in (a) of this subsection.

(2) The director may also serve upon the same respondent a written notice and order suspending the respondent from further participation in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of the state trust company, its affiliate, or any depository institution, trust company, or affiliate of such depository institution or trust company, doing business in Washington state, pending resolution of the charges made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, if the director determines that such an action is necessary for the protection of: The state trust company or its affiliate; the interests of beneficiaries, trustors, or shareholders of the state trust company or its affiliate; the interests of any depository institution or its depositors, trust beneficiaries, borrowers, or shareholders; or the general public.

(3) A suspension order issued by the director is effective upon service and, unless the superior court issues a stay of such order, such order shall remain in effect and enforceable until:

(a) The director dismisses the charges contained in the notice served on the person; or

(b) The effective date of a final order for removal of such person.

[ 2019 c 389 s 24; 2014 c 37 s 341.]